Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-918
Unsafe or unauthorized activities;
powers of department.

If
the department, upon investigation, determines that any officer or director
of a bank holding company which owns or controls a state-chartered bank is
conducting the business of the bank holding company or the business of its
subsidiary state-chartered bank or banks in an unsafe or unauthorized manner
or is endangering the interest of the bank holding company or the interest
of its subsidiary state-chartered bank or banks, the department shall have
authority, after notice and opportunity for hearing, to do any or all of the
following: (1) Remove such officer or director of the bank holding company
from acting as an officer or director of the bank holding company; and (2)
impose fines and order any other necessary corrective action against such
officer or director pursuant to sections 8-1,134 to 8-1,139. The department
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2010, LB890, § 11.